Utah statutes.
41-6a-517.   Definitions -- Driving with any measurable controlled substance
in the body -- Penalties -- Arrest without warrant.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Controlled substance" means any substance scheduled under Section
58-37-4.
(b)  "Practitioner" has the same meaning as provided in Section 58-37-2.
(c)  "Prescribe" has the same meaning as provided in Section 58-37-2.
(d)  "Prescription" has the same meaning as provided in Section 58-37-2.
(2)  In cases not amounting to a violation of Section 41-6a-502, a person may
not operate or be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this
state if the person has any measurable controlled substance or metabolite of a
controlled substance in the person's body.
(3)  It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the
controlled substance was:
(a)  involuntarily ingested by the accused;
(b)  prescribed by a practitioner for use by the accused; or
(c)  otherwise legally ingested.
(4) (a)  A person convicted of a violation of Subsection (2) is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor.
(b)  A person who violates this section is subject to conviction and
sentencing under both this section and any applicable offense under Section
58-37-8.
(5)  A peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person for a violation
of this section when the officer has probable cause to believe the violation
has occurred, although not in the officer's presence, and if the officer has
probable cause to believe that the violation was committed by the person.
(6)  The Driver License Division shall:
(a)  if the person is 21 years of age or older on the date of arrest:
(i)  suspend, for a period of 120 days, the driver license of a person
convicted under Subsection (2) of an offense committed on or after July 1,
2009; or
(ii)  revoke, for a period of two years, the driver license of a person if:
(A)  the person has a prior conviction as defined under Subsection
41-6a-501(2); and
(B)  the current violation under Subsection (2) is committed:
(I)  within a period of 10 years after the date of the prior violation; and
(II)  on or after July 1, 2009;
(b)  if the person is under 21 years of age on the date of arrest:
(i)  suspend, until the person is 21 years of age or for a period of 120 days,
the driver license of a person convicted under Subsection (2) of an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2009; or
(ii)  revoke, until the person is 21 years of age or for a period of two
years, the driver license of a person if:
(A)  the person has a prior conviction as defined under Subsection
41-6a-501(2); and
(B)  the current violation under Subsection (2) is committed:
(I)  within a period of 10 years after the date of the prior violation; and
(II)  on or after July 1, 2009;
(c)  subtract from any suspension or revocation period the number of days for
which a license was previously suspended under Section 53-3-223 or 53-3-231,
if the previous suspension was based on the same occurrence upon which the
record of conviction is based; and
(d)  deny, suspend, or revoke a person's license for the denial and suspension
periods in effect prior to July 1, 2009, for a conviction of a violation under
Subsection (2) that was committed prior to July 1, 2009.
(7) (a)  The court shall notify the Driver License Division if a person fails
to:
(i)  complete all court ordered screening and assessment, educational series,
and substance abuse treatment; or
(ii)  pay all fines and fees, including fees for restitution and treatment
costs.
(b)  Upon receiving the notification, the division shall suspend the person's
driving privilege in accordance with Subsections 53-3-221(2) and (3).
(8)  The court shall order supervised probation in accordance with Section
41-6a-507 for a person convicted under Subsection (2).
